dictsource/ss_rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// translation rules for Swazi


.group a
   a       a

.group b
   b       b

.group c
   c       c[
   ch      c[H

.group d
   d       dH
   dl      K
   dv      dv
   dvw     dvw
   dz      dz

.group e
   e       e

.group f
   f       f

.group g
   g       gH
   gc      g[

.group h
   h       h
   hh      H
   hl      l#

.group i
   i       i

.group j
   j       dZH

.group k
   k       k`?
   kh      k#
   khw     k#w
   kl      kl#

.group l
   l       l
   lw      lw

.group m
   m       m
   mb      mb

.group n
   n       n
   nc      N-c[
   nch     N-c[h
   ndl     N-K
   _) ng   N-g
   ng      Ng
   ngc     N-gc[H
   ngw     N-gw
   _) nhl  N-l#
   nhl     Nl#
   _) nkhw  N-k#w
   nkhw    Nk#w

.group o
   o       o

.group p
   p       p`?
   ph      ph

.group q
   q       k`?

.group s
   s       s
   sh      S
   sw      sw

.group t
   t       t`?
   tf      tf
   th      t#
   tj      tS`?
   ts      ts?

.group u
   u       u

.group v
   v       v
   vw      vw

.group w
   w       w

.group y
   y       j

.group z
   z       z
   zh      Z

.group
        $        idHola
        %        emap`?eSent`?i

        *        luphawulwenk#hanjet`?i
    *)  * (*
        **
   **)  * (_     _::

   
